Utah statutes.
26-1-3.   Purpose of title -- Consolidation of health functions into single state agency.

The purpose of this title is to consolidate into a single agency of state government certain health functions exercised by the Department of Human Services including those performed by the Division of Health, the Board of Health, the Office of Health Care Financing and Standards, the State Health Planning Development Agency, the Nursing Home Advisory Council, the Health Facilities Council, and similar affiliated agencies, in order to more efficiently and effectively manage health programs that are the responsibility of the state, to establish a health policy for the state and to promote health, the quality of life, and contain costs in the health field.



Amended by Chapter 112, 1991 General Session

